Massachusetts, session 194th, S257.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. The General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition are hereby 
2 amended by inserting after Chapter 112 the following new chapter:- 
3  Chapter 112A. Interstate Dental and Dental Hygiene Licensure Compact 
4  Section 1. Purpose 
5  This Compact shall be known as the Interstate Dental and Dental Hygiene Licensure 
6 Compact and the purpose of the Compact is to expedite licensure and increase access to dental 
7 health care through licensure boards acting in cooperation.  The Compact adopts the existing 
8 structures most utilized by Dental Boards across the United States, while ensuring the safety of 
9 the public through the sharing of documents and information. This Compact ensures that each 
10 state retains the right to impose an adverse action on a licensee as a home state or as a practicing 
11 state. Each state has an opportunity to share investigations and information with the home state 

2 of 28 12 of licensure. The Compact is operated by state dental board members, administrators and other 
13 staff, thus allowing for each state to maintain its sovereignty. 
14  The Compact: 
15  (i) Allows for expedited licensure portability and ease of movement of licensees between 
16 states;  
17  (ii) Allows each state to continue to regulate the practice of dentistry and dental hygiene 
18 within its borders; 
19  (iii) Creates a common goal of protecting the public by ensuring a uniform licensure 
20 standard and sharing of information in the Compact; 
21  (iv) Allows for licensure in every participating state by requiring passage of the uniform 
22 licensure examination that assesses psychomotor and cognitive dental skills and is currently 
23 accepted in fifty state (50) licensing jurisdictions and United States territories;  
24  (v) Gives licensees one (1) location to maintain professional documentation to expedite 
25 license transfers in states, hospitals or institutional credentialing; 
26  (vi) Facilitates a faster licensure process for relocation or separation of military members 
27 and their dependent spouses; there are no Compact fees for military members or their spouses;  
28  (vii) Alleviates a duplicative process for licensure among multiple states; and, 
29  (viii) Saves applicants money by not having to obtain duplicate documents from a source 
30 that charges for the documents. 
31  Section 2. Definitions 

3 of 28 32  As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the following meanings unless the 
33 context clearly requires otherwise: 
34  “AADB”, the American Association of Dental Boards (AADB) or its named successor, 
35 formerly known as the American Association of Dental Examiners (AADE), originally chartered 
36 on September 10th, 1896 and renewed in 1944, comprised of State Dental Boards in the United 
37 States and its territories. 
38  “Attorneys’ Committee”, the committee of attorneys who  currently represent a Member 
39 State Dental Board. The Attorneys’ Committee shall designate one of its members to participate 
40 in the Commission as a non-voting member. An attorney that has previously served as an 
41 attorney for a Member State Dental Board may be invited on a year-to-year basis to serve on the 
42 Attorneys’ Committee if they have not engaged in an official case against a State Dental Board 
43 or have any other conflict of interest. The Attorneys’ Committee may assist the investigators in 
44 working through joint investigation issues between states. 
45  “Active-duty military person or spouse”, a Licensee in full-time active-duty status in the 
46 active uniformed services of the United States, including members of the National Guard and 
47 Reserves. The legal spouse of the military member must be recognized by the military unit as a 
48 dependent while the service member is on active duty. Spouses shall receive the same privileges 
49 as military members for the purpose of this Compact. 
50  “Active Investigation”, an active investigation potentially resulting in formal allegations 
51 or charges precipitating a judicial process by a State Dental Board, oversight agency, or other 
52 law enforcement entity. 

4 of 28 53  “Adverse Action”, an order issued by a State Dental Board or reported to the 
54 clearinghouse pursuant to the Commission’s Bylaws and rules that disciplines a Licensee. 
55 Adverse Action includes, and is not limited to, the suspension, limiting, or revocation of a 
56 License or Compact License Privilege; the imposition of fees and sanctions; and any  temporary 
57 emergency order that may be later withdrawn by a Board. 
58  “ADEX examination”, the initial licensure examinations developed by the American 
59 Board of Dental Examiners, Inc. or its successor. 
60  “Bylaws”, the bylaws passed by the Commission or its named successor commission. 
61  “Clearinghouse”, the clearinghouse and databank that houses prior Adverse Action 
62 documentations, orders and denials of licensure or permits from State Dental Boards that is 
63 administered by the AADB or its successor.  
64  “CODA”, the Commission on Dental Accreditation or its successor as approved by the 
65 United States Department of Education. 
66  “Commission”, the Interstate Dental and Dental Hygiene Compact Licensure 
67 Commission created pursuant to Section 3 of this Act. 
68  “Commissioners”, the two (2) members chosen by each Member State Dental Board to 
69 serve as the voting members of the Commission. 
70  “Compact”, the Interstate Dental and Dental Hygiene Licensure Compact created 
71 pursuant to this Chapter. 
72  “Compact License Privilege”, the expedited dental or dental hygiene license to practice in 
73 a Member State that is not the Licensee’s Home State. 

5 of 28 74  “Conviction”, an adjudication or formal judgment by a court that an individual is guilty 
75 through a plea of guilty or no contest, or a finding of guilt by the court. Evidence of a conviction 
76 of a criminal offense by the court shall be considered final for the purposes of considering or 
77 imposing disciplinary action by a Member State Dental Board. 
78  “Criminal background check”, a criminal background check using the results of 
79 fingerprint or other biometric data checks compliant with the requirements of the Federal Bureau 
80 of Investigation, with the exception of federal employees who have suitability determination in 
81 accordance with 5 C.F.R. 731.202. 
82  “Dental hygienist”, any person who: (i) has successfully graduated from a CODA-
83 approved dental hygiene school; (ii) has successfully passed the ADEX dental hygiene licensure 
84 examination; or has been in practice 5 years or more and has successfully passed a Regional 
85 Board Examination or equivalent state-administered psychomotor licensure examination prior to 
86 January 1, 2024; (iii) has successfully passed the written national dental hygiene board 
87 examination administered by the Joint Commission on National Dental Examinations; (iv) 
88 possesses a full and unrestricted dental hygiene license issued by a Member State; (v) has never 
89 been convicted or received adjudication, deferred adjudication, community supervision or 
90 deferred disposition for any  offense (other than traffic offenses) by a court of appropriate 
91 jurisdiction; (vi) has never been a subject of discipline by a Licensing Agency through any 
92 Adverse Action, order, or other restriction of the Licensee by a Licensing Agency, with the 
93 exception of failure to pay fees or failure to complete continuing education; (vii) is not currently 
94 under Active Investigation by a Licensing Agency or law enforcement authority in any state, 
95 federal or foreign jurisdiction; and (viii) meets any jurisprudence requirement established by a 

6 of 28 96 Member State Dental Board of a Member State in which a Licensee is seeking a Compact 
97 License Privilege. 
98  “Dental Practice Act”, the laws and regulations governing the practice of dentistry within 
99 a Member State. 
100  “Dentist”, any person who: (i) has successfully graduated from a CODA-approved dental 
101 school; (ii) has successfully passed the ADEX dental  licensure exam; or has been in practice 5 
102 years or more and has successfully passed a Regional Board Examination or equivalent state-
103 administered psychomotor licensure examination prior to January 1, 2024; (iii) has successfully 
104 passed the written National Dental Board Exam administered by the Joint Commission on 
105 National Dental Examinations; (iv) possesses a full and unrestricted dental license issued by a 
106 Member State Dental Board; (v) has never been convicted or received adjudication, deferred 
107 adjudication, community supervision, or deferred disposition for any offense (other than traffic 
108 offenses) by a court of appropriate jurisdiction; (vi) has never been a subject of discipline by a 
109 Licensing Agency through any Adverse Action, order, or other restriction of the Licensee by a 
110 Licensing Agency, with the exception of failure to pay fees or failure to complete continuing 
111 education; (vii) has never had a state or federal drug registration, permit, or license restricted, 
112 suspended, or revoked by the United States Drug Enforcement Administration or any Licensing 
113 Agency that oversees scheduled drug registrations; (viii) is not currently under Active 
114 Investigation by a Licensing Agency or law enforcement authority in any state, federal or foreign 
115 jurisdiction; and (ix) meets any jurisprudence requirement established by a Member State Dental 
116 Board in which a Licensee is seeking a Compact License Privilege. 
117  “Home State”, the state of primary licensure of a Licensee. 

7 of 28 118  “License”, the authorization by a Licensing Authority for a dentist or dental hygienist to 
119 engage in the unrestricted practice of dentistry or dental hygiene, which would be unlawful 
120 without such license. 
121  “Licensee”, a Dentist or Dental Hygienist who holds an unrestricted License to practice 
122 as a dentists or dental hygienist. 
123  “Licensing Agency”, the agency or other entity of a State that is responsible for the 
124 licensing of Dentists and Dental Hygienists. If a Member State Dental Board has such 
125 responsibility, it shall be deemed a Licensing Agency. 
126  “Member State Dental Board”, a state agency in a Member State that protects the public 
127 through licensure, regulation, and the education of dentist and dental hygienists, as directed by 
128 the state law. All actions taken by a Member State Dental Board shall be under the authority of 
129 the laws its State and any other rights conferred under this Compact. 
130  “Member State”, a state, the District of Colombia or any other United States territory that 
131 has enacted the Compact. 
132  “Regional Board Examination”, initial licensure examinations administered by the 
133 Western Regional Examining Board (WREB), the North East Regional Board of Dental 
134 Examiners (NERB), the Commission on Dental Competency Assessments (CDCA), Council of 
135 Interstate Testing Agencies (CITA), Southern Regional Testing Agency (SRTA), or Central 
136 Regional Dental Testing Services (CRDTS) that assess psychomotor skills. 
137  “Repository”, the repository of original documents of a Licensee that may include 
138 original transcripts, certification documents, test scores, military training records, previous or 

8 of 28 139 current licensing documents and other sources of materials needed for applications and 
140 verification administered by the AADB or its successor.  The Repository shall receive documents 
141 from primary or originating sources and/or verify their authenticity. 
142  “Scope of practice”, the dental-related procedures that require a License, permit, or 
143 training, to undertake the treatment and procedure to be completed on a patient within the 
144 Member State’s requirements. 
145  “State”, a state within the United States or a United States Territory. 
146  “State jurisprudence”, the knowledge of a Member State’s laws and rules of dentistry and 
147 dental hygiene. 
148  Section 3. Compact and Commission 
149  (a) The Member States hereby create the Interstate Dental and Dental Hygiene Licensure 
150 Compact and the Commission. Each Member State must enact a compact that is not materially 
151 different from this Compact, as determined by the Commission. 
152  (b) Each Member State Dental Board shall have two (2) voting members who shall serve 
153 as Commissioners. Each Commissioner shall have one (1) vote. Member States with separate 
154 dental and dental hygiene Licensing Agencies shall appoint one (1) Commissioner from each 
155 licensing agency. One Commissioner shall be a current member of a Member State Dental 
156 Board.  Commissioners may not delegate votes or vote by proxy, however, if a Commissioner is 
157 unable to attend, the Member State may substitute a Commissioner who meets the same 
158 requirements. 

9 of 28 159  (c) Upon five (5) states joining the Compact, the Compact shall become active.  The 
160 Commission shall adopt Bylaws upon becoming active. 
161  (d) The Commission shall meet at least once per calendar year (the “Annual Meeting”) 
162 and at additional times as necessary pursuant to the Bylaws and rules. 
163  (e) At each Annual Meeting, the Commission shall elect a Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary, 
164 and Treasurer from the membership of the Commission (the “Officers.”) The Officers shall be 
165 members of the Commission’s Executive Committee (the “Executive Committee.”) The 
166 Commission shall also elect representatives from four (4) regional districts established by the 
167 Commission to serve on the Executive Committee. All Officers and Executive Committee 
168 representatives shall serve one (1)-year terms. 
169  (f) Quorum for purposes of conducting business shall be a majority of Commissioners 
170 attending in person or virtually. 
171  (g) The Commission shall provide notice of all meetings on its website and in other 
172 communications to Member State Dental Boards. 
173  (h) A vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the Commissioners present shall be required for an 
174 executive session to discuss:  
175  (1) Items specifically related to participation in a lawsuit or in anticipation of a legal 
176 proceeding; 
177  (2) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal statute; 
178   (3) Information or matters involving law enforcement agencies or information that 
179 accuses a person of a crime or a public censure;  

10 of 28 180   (4) Discussions that would include information of a personal nature that would constitute 
181 an unwarranted invasion of personal privacy; 
182   (5) Anything considered internal practices and procedures or a trade secret; 
183   (6) Other items described in the Commission Bylaws allowing for executive sessions to 
184 be called; or, 
185   (7) Advice of Legal Counsel. 
186  (i) The Commission shall keep minutes and make them available to all Member States. 
187  (j) The Commission may establish other committees as needed. 
188  (k) The Commission shall prepare an annual report that shall be made available to the 
189 legislatures and governors of the Member States. The annual report shall describe the activities 
190 of the Commission during the preceding calendar year. Such reports shall also include reports of 
191 the annual financial audit and any actions taken by or rules that were adopted by the 
192 Commission. 
193  Section 4. Duties of Compact Member States 
194  (a) Member States shall submit to the Clearinghouse all Member State Dental Board 
195 actions and other documents and data as determined by the Commission. 
196  (b) Member States shall notify the Commission of any Adverse Action taken by the 
197 Member State Dental Board, any Active Investigation by the Member State Dental Board, any 
198 Active Investigation involving pending criminal charges, or other circumstance as determined by 
199 the Commission. 

11 of 28 200  (c) Any Adverse Action, order, restriction or denial of a license or permit on a Licensee 
201 or Compact License Privilege holder shall be reported to the Clearinghouse by the Member State 
202 Dental Board. 
203  (d) Member State Dental Boards may submit to the Clearinghouse nonpublic complaints, 
204 or disciplinary or investigatory information not required by Section 4(c).  All investigatory 
205 material shall be considered confidential and not part of a public record unless otherwise 
206 specifically required by state statute. 
207  (e) Members States shall accept continuing education credits as required or recognized by 
208 any other Member State. 
209  (f) Documents in the Repository shall be treated by a Member State as the equivalent of a 
210 primary or original source document for licensure. 
211  (g) Member States shall accept a standardized application for a Compact License 
212 Privilege.  The standardized application shall be established by the rules enacted by the 
213 Commission. 
214  (h) Member States may agree to share information regarding ongoing investigations and 
215 actions, including joint investigations between states. All investigatory material shall be 
216 considered confidential and not part of a public record unless otherwise specifically required by 
217 state statute. 
218  (i) As part of the Compact enforcement, participating Member States may issue 
219 subpoenas and seek testimony of witnesses, which subpoenas shall be enforced in other Member 

12 of 28 220 States and enforced by a court of competent jurisdiction where the witnesses or evidence is 
221 located. 
222  Section 5. Powers and Duties of the Commission 
223  (a) The Commission shall have the duty and power to: 
224  (1) Oversee and maintain the administration of the Compact, including the organizational 
225 needs, the financial activities, the hiring of personnel and ongoing activities or needs of the 
226 Commission; 
227  (2) Promulgate Bylaws and rules to operate the Compact and the Commission; 
228  (3) Establish a budget and make expenditures; 
229  (4) Have an annual financial audit performed by an independent certified public 
230 accounting firm;  
231  (5) Issue, upon the request of a Member State Dental Board, advisory opinions 
232 concerning the meaning or interpretation of the Compact and its Bylaws, rules, and actions; 
233  (6) Enforce compliance with Compact provisions, the rules promulgated by the 
234 Commission, and the Bylaws, using all necessary and proper means, including but not limited to 
235 the use of judicial process; 
236  (7) Hold an Annual Meeting for the Commission where the elections of the Executive 
237 Committee and other issues may be discussed and voted on; 
238  (8) Establish personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, and the 
239 rates of compensation and qualifications of personnel; 

13 of 28 240  (9) Accept donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, 
241 and to receive, utilize and dispose of them in a manner consistent with the conflict-of-interest 
242 policies established by the Commission; 
243  (10) Report annually to the legislatures and governors of the Member State Dental 
244 Boards concerning the activities of the Commission during the preceding calendar year. Such 
245 reports shall also include reports of annual financial audits, all actions of the Commission, rules 
246 adopted by the Commission, and any recommendations by the Commission; and, 
247  (11) Coordinate education, training and public awareness regarding the Compact, its 
248 implementation, and its operation. 
249  (b) The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the Commission, 
250 with the exception of rulemaking, during periods when the Commission is not in session. When 
251 acting on behalf of the Commission, the Executive Committee shall oversee the administration of 
252 the Compact, including enforcement of and compliance with the Compact. 
253  (c) The officers and employees of the Commission shall be immune from suit and 
254 liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for a claim for damage to or loss of 
255 property or personal injury or other civil liability caused or arising out of, or relating to, an actual 
256 or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that such person had a reasonable basis for 
257 believing occurred, within the scope of Commission employment, duties or responsibilities; 
258 provided, that such person shall not be protected from suit or liability for damage, loss, injury or 
259 liability caused by the intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of such person. 
260  (d) The liability of the executive director and employees of the Commission or 
261 representatives of the Commission, acting within the scope of such person's employment or 

14 of 28 262 duties for acts, errors or omissions occurring within such person's state may not exceed the limits 
263 of liability set forth under the constitution and laws of that state for state officials, employees and 
264 agents. The Commission shall be considered to be an instrumentality of the states for the 
265 purposes of any such action. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to protect such person 
266 from suit or liability for damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the intentional or willful and 
267 wanton misconduct of such person. 
268  (e) The Commission shall defend the Commission’s executive director, its employees, 
269 and, subject to the approval of the attorney general or other appropriate legal counsel of the 
270 Member State represented by an Commission representative, shall defend such Commission 
271 representative in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of an actual or alleged 
272 act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties or 
273 responsibilities, or that the defendant had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the 
274 scope of Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged 
275 act, error or omission did not result from intentional or willful and wanton misconduct on the 
276 part of such person. 
277  (f) To the extent not covered by the state involved, Member State, or the Commission, the 
278 representatives or employees of the Commission shall be held harmless by the Commission in 
279 the amount of a settlement or judgment, including attorney fees and costs, obtained against such 
280 persons arising out of an actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of 
281 Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or that such persons had a reasonable basis 
282 for believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, 
283 provided that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result from intentional or willful 
284 and wanton misconduct on the part of such persons. 

15 of 28 285  Section 6. Application, Eligibility, and Issuance of Compact License Privilege to a 
286 Member State 
287  (a) A dentist or dental hygienist applying for Compact License Privileges shall meet the 
288 requirements of a Dentist as listed in Section (2)(r) of this Compact or a Dental Hygienist as 
289 listed in Section (2)(p) of this Compact and hold a current License in a Member State under this 
290 Compact. 
291  (b) Each Dentist or Dental Hygienist shall designate a Home State of licensure. The 
292 Home State shall be determined by: 
293  (1) The State of primary residence for the Dentist or Dental Hygienist, where twenty-five 
294 percent (25%) of their practice within one year occurs. An active-duty military member or their 
295 spouse may choose a Home State as designated with the military but are not required to meet the 
296 requirement of twenty-five percent (25%) practice being within their Home State; or, 
297  (2) If no State qualifies under Section 6(b)(1), then the State that the Dentist or Dental 
298 Hygienist listed as their state of residence on the previous year’s federal tax return. 
299  (c) A Dentist or Dental Hygienist may redesignate a Home State no more than one time 
300 in a calendar year if the qualifications of a Home State are met. 
301  (d) A Dentist or Dental hygienist seeking a Compact License Privilege (the “Applicant”) 
302 shall apply to their Home State Dental Board for a letter stating that the Applicant is eligible for 
303 Compact License Privileges. 

16 of 28 304  (e) The Home State Dental Board shall determine the eligibility of an application for a 
305 Compact License Privilege and shall issue a letter of approval or denial of the application for a 
306 Compact License Privilege. 
307  (f) The letter from the Applicant’s Home State Dental Board approving the application 
308 shall be submitted to the Member State Dental Board for the Member State in which the 
309 Applicant proposes to practice, and shall include: (i) the Compact application packet; (ii) 
310 authorization to seek access to the Applicant’s  Repository documents; (iii) any additional 
311 information that may be required by the proposed Compact License Privilege state; and (iv) any 
312 required fees. The Member State Dental Board shall review the application to confirm 
313 compliance with the Member State’s laws and regulations. Following such review, if the 
314 Member State Dental Board approves the application, it shall issue a Compact License Privilege 
315 from the proposed Member State  to the Applicant. 
316  (g) Appeals of a denial of a Compact License Privilege application shall be filed with the 
317 Member State Dental Board making such determination, and shall be filed within thirty (30) 
318 dates of the date of the denial.  
319  (h) A Licensee holding a Compact License Privilege shall notify the Commission within 
320 ten (10) business days of any Adverse Action taken against a License held in a state that is not a 
321 Member State. 
322  (i) A Compact License Privilege may be revoked, suspended or limited by the issuing 
323 Member State Dental Board if at any time the Licensee’s Home State license is revoked, 
324 suspended or limited. 

17 of 28 325  (j) The Commission shall issue rules on the duration of a Compact License Privilege, the 
326 application and renewal process for a Compact License Privilege, and any application fees. 
327  (k) Eligibility or ineligibility to receive a Compact License Privilege shall not limit the 
328 ability of a Licensee to seek a state license through the regular process outside of the Compact.  
329  Section 7. Jurisdiction Over Compact License Privilege Holders 
330  (a) Each Licensee holding a Compact License Privilege shall be subject to and comply 
331 with the laws and regulations of the Member State in which such Licensee  practices under a 
332 Compact License Privilege. 
333  (b) Each Licensee holding a Compact License Privilege shall be subject to the 
334 jurisdiction and authority of the Member State Dental Board of the state in which such Licensee 
335 practices, as if they held a license issued from such Member State Dental Board. Such Compact 
336 License Privilege holder shall be deemed a “Licensee” of the Member State Dental Board for 
337 purposes of such board taking an Adverse Action. 
338  (c) Each Licensee holding a Compact License Privilege shall list a current address with 
339 the Commission that shall serve as their official address of service. 
340  (d) A Licensee holding a Compact License Privilege may have an Adverse Action taken 
341 against them by: 
342  (1) The Member State Dental Board of the Member State in which they are practicing 
343 with a Compact License Privilege; 
344  (2) The Licensee’s Home State; or, 

18 of 28 345  (3) The State Licensing Authority of a State that is not a Member State from which the 
346 Licensee holds a License. 
347  (e) A Home State may take an Adverse Action against the holder of a Compact License 
348 Privilege, regardless of where the actions giving rise to the Adverse Action occurred. 
349  (f) Any Member State in which the Compact Licensee holds a Compact License Privilege 
350 may investigate an allegation of a violation of the laws and rules of the practice of dentistry or 
351 dental hygiene in any other State where the Compact Licensee holds a Compact License 
352 Privilege. 
353  Section 8. Fees and Military Waiver 
354  (a) The Commission shall issue rules regarding the use of the Repository by each holder 
355 of a Compact License Privilege. 
356  (b) A Member State Dental Board issuing a Compact License Privilege authorizing 
357 practice in its State may impose a fee for a Compact License Privilege, for ether initial issuance 
358 or any renewal. 
359  (c) No Compact fee shall be required of any  active-duty military member and/or their 
360 spouse up to one (1) year after separation from the service. Each Member State issuing a 
361 Compact License Privilege may waive fees for active-duty military and/or their spouse as 
362 required by each individual state statute. 
363  (d) Active-duty military may transfer military training records to the Repository without a 
364 fee. 
365  Section 9. Joint Investigations and Disciplinary Actions 

19 of 28 366  (a) Each Member State shall name a point of contact for joint investigations between 
367 Member State Dental Boards. 
368  (b) Member State Dental Boards may participate with other Member State Dental Boards 
369 in joint investigations of Licensees that are subject to this Compact. 
370  (c) Member State Dental Boards may share investigative, litigation or other materials in 
371 furtherance of any joint or individual investigation of a Compact License Privilege holder. 
372  (d) A subpoena issued by a Member State or Member State Dental Board shall be 
373 enforceable in other Member States as allowed by law. 
374  (e) If a Compact License Privilege holder has an Adverse Action taken against them by 
375 any Member State Dental Board, the Compact License Privilege holder, Licensee shall 
376 automatically be subject to similar discipline by other Member State Dental Boards. 
377  (f) If a Compact License Privilege holder has an Adverse Action taken against their 
378 Home State license, including being revoked, surrendered, or relinquished in lieu of discipline or 
379 suspended, then automatically all other Compact License Privileges shall be placed in the same 
380 status. The Home State Dental Board shall notify the Commission and the Commission shall 
381 issue a notice to all Member State Dental Boards of such Adverse Action. 
382  (g) If discipline or an Adverse Action is taken against a Compact License Privilege 
383 holder in a Member State, the Member State Board shall notify the Commission and the Home 
384 State of the Compact License Privilege holder. The Home State may deem the action conclusive 
385 as a matter of law and fact  and may: (i) impose the same or lesser sanction consistent with the 

20 of 28 386 Home State’s laws; or, (ii) pursue separate actions against the Compact License Privilege holder 
387 under its laws, regardless of the sanctions pursued by the Member State Dental Board. 
388  Section 10. Other Requests for Information From the Repository and the Clearinghouse 
389  (a) Insurance companies and entities verifying documents for the purpose of licenses 
390 extended to a Dentist or Dental Hygienist may seek information from the Clearinghouse for 
391 public record documents. 
392  (b) A Dentist or Dental Hygienist may submit a request to the Commission to allow any 
393 hiring employer, entity, or insurance company to access documents from the Repository for the 
394 purposes of credentialing, licensing or other privileges. 
395  (c) The Commission shall set a fee schedule for these services. 
396  Section 11. Rulemaking Functions of the Commission 
397  (a) The Commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to effectively and 
398 efficiently implement and achieve the purposes and administration of the Compact. 
399 Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the Commission exercises its rulemaking authority 
400 in a manner that is beyond the scope of the purposes of the Compact or the powers granted 
401 hereunder, then such an action by the Commission may be determined to be invalid and have no 
402 force or effect. 
403  (b) Rules validly issued by the Commission shall have the force of law in each Member 
404 State. 

21 of 28 405  (c) Rules deemed appropriate for the operations of the Commission shall be made 
406 pursuant to a rulemaking process that substantially conforms to the Model State Administrative 
407 Procedure Act of 2010, and subsequent amendments thereto. 
408  Section 12. Oversight of the Compact 
409  (a) The executive, legislative, and judicial branches of state government in each Member 
410 State shall enforce the Compact and shall take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate 
411 the Compact's purposes and intent to allow for expedited licensure for the purpose of mobility. 
412 The provisions of the Compact and the rules promulgated hereunder shall have standing as 
413 statutory law but shall not override existing state authority to regulate the practice of dentistry 
414 and dental hygiene. 
415  (b) All courts may take judicial notice of the Compact and the rules in any judicial or 
416 administrative proceeding in a Member State pertaining to the subject matter of the Compact 
417 which may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the Commission. 
418  (c) The Commission shall be entitled to receive all service of process in any such 
419 proceeding and shall have standing to intervene in the proceeding for all purposes. Except where 
420 the Commission has intervened, failure to provide service of process to the Commission shall 
421 render a judgment or order void as to the Commission, the Compact or promulgated rules. 
422  Section 13. Enforcement and Default Procedures 
423  (a) The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the 
424 provisions and rules of the Compact. 

22 of 28 425  (b) The grounds for default under this Compact by a Member State include, but are not 
426 limited to, failure of a Member State to perform such obligations or responsibilities imposed 
427 upon it by the Compact or by the rules and Bylaws of the Commission promulgated under the 
428 Compact. 
429  (c) If the Commission determines that a Member State has defaulted in the performance 
430 of its obligations or responsibilities under the Compact, or the Bylaws or promulgated rules, the 
431 Commission shall: (i) provide written notice to the defaulting state and other Member States of 
432 the nature of the default, the means of curing the default, any action taken by the Commission, 
433 and the conditions by which the defaulting state must cure its default; and, (ii) provide remedial 
434 training and specific technical assistance regarding the default. 
435  (d) If the defaulting state fails to cure the default, the defaulting state shall be terminated 
436 from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the Commissioners and all rights, 
437 privileges and benefits conferred by the Compact shall terminate on the effective date of 
438 termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities 
439 incurred during the period of the default. 
440  (e) Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only after all other 
441 means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to terminate shall be given 
442 by the Commission to the Governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state's 
443 legislature and each of the Member States. 
444  (f) The Commission shall establish rules and procedures to address licenses and Compact 
445 License Privilege holders that are materially impacted by the termination of a Member State or 
446 the withdrawal of a Member State. 

23 of 28 447  (g) The Commission shall not bear any costs relating to any state that has been found to 
448 be in default or which has been terminated from the Compact, unless otherwise mutually agreed 
449 upon in writing between the Commission and the defaulting state. 
450  (h) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Commission by petitioning the state 
451 court where the Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all 
452 costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorneys’ fees. 
453  (i) The Commission shall not bear any costs relating to any state that has been found to 
454 be in default or which has been terminated from the Compact, unless otherwise mutually agreed 
455 upon in writing between the Commission and the defaulting state. 
456  (j) The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission. The 
457 Commission may avail itself of any other remedies available under state law or the regulation of 
458 a profession. 
459  Section 14. Dispute Resolution 
460  (a) The Commission shall attempt, upon the request of a Member State Dental Board, to 
461 resolve disputes which are subject to the Compact and which may arise among Member State 
462 Dental Boards. 
463  (b) The Commission shall promulgate rules providing for both mediation and voluntary 
464 binding dispute resolution, as appropriate. 
465  Section 15. Member States, Effective Date and Amendment 
466  (a) Any state is eligible to become a Member State of the Compact. 

24 of 28 467  (b) The Compact shall become effective and binding upon legislative enactment of the 
468 Compact into law by no less than five (5) states. Thereafter, it shall become effective and binding 
469 on a state upon enactment of the Compact into law by that State. 
470  (c) The governors of non-member states, or their designees, shall be invited to participate 
471 in the activities of the Commission on a nonvoting basis prior to adoption of the Compact by all 
472 States. 
473  (d) The Commission may propose amendments to the Compact for enactment by the 
474 Member States. No amendment shall become effective and binding upon the Commission and 
475 the Member States unless and until it is enacted into law by unanimous consent of the Member 
476 States. 
477  Section 16. Withdrawal 
478  (a) Once effective, the Compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon each 
479 and every Member State; provided, however, that a Member State may withdraw from the 
480 Compact after giving appropriate notice by specifically repealing the statute which enacted the 
481 Compact into law. 
482  (b) The Licensee’s Compact License Privilege shall remain in effect for six (6) months 
483 from the date of the Member State Dental Board withdrawal.   
484  (c) The withdrawing State shall immediately notify the chairperson of the Commission in 
485 writing upon the introduction of legislation repealing the Compact by the withdrawing State, and 
486 upon the enactment of such legislation. 

25 of 28 487  (d) The Commission shall notify the other Member States within sixty (60) days of its 
488 receipt of notice provided under Section 16(c) of this section. 
489  (e) Reinstatement following withdrawal of a Member State shall occur upon the 
490 withdrawing state reenacting the Compact or upon such later date as determined by the 
491 Commission. 
492  (f) The Commission shall issue rules to address the impact of the withdrawal of a 
493 Member State on Licenses granted by other Member States to dentists and dental hygienists who 
494 designated the withdrawing Member State as their Home State. 
495  Section 17. Dissolution 
496  (a) The Compact shall dissolve effective upon the date of the withdrawal or default of the 
497 Member State which reduces the membership in the Compact to one (1) Member State. 
498  (b) Upon the dissolution of the Compact, the Compact shall become null and void and 
499 shall be of no further force or effect, and the business and affairs of the Commission shall be 
500 concluded and surplus funds shall be distributed in accordance with the Bylaws. 
501  Section 18. Severability and Construction 
502  (a) The provisions of the Compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence 
503 or provision is deemed unenforceable, the remaining provisions of the Compact shall be 
504 enforceable. 
505  (b) The provisions of the Compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes. 
506  Section 19. Binding Effect of Compact and Other Laws 

26 of 28 507  (a) Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of a Member State that is 
508 not inconsistent with the Compact. 
509  (b) All lawful actions of the Commission, including all rules and Bylaws promulgated by 
510 the Commission, shall be binding upon the Member States. 
511  (c) All agreements between the Commission and the Member States shall be binding in 
512 accordance with their terms. 
513  (d) In the event any provision of the Compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed 
514 on the legislature of any Member State, such provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the 
515 conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that Member State. 
516  Section 20. Rules of Order 
517  The most current edition of the American Institute of Parliamentarians Standard Code of 
518 Parliamentary Procedure shall all meetings of the Commission, including its committees, in those 
519 situations not otherwise covered in the Bylaws. 
520  Section 21. The commonwealth, its officers and employees, and the board of registration 
521 in dentistry and its agents who act in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall not be 
522 liable on account of any act or omission in good faith while engaged in the performance of their 
523 duties under this chapter. Good faith shall not include willful misconduct, gross negligence, or 
524 recklessness. 
525  Section 22. As part of the licensure and background check process for a Compact License 
526 Privilege and to determine the suitability of an applicant for Compact License Privilege, the 
527 board of registration in dentisty, prior to issuing any Compact License Privilege, shall conduct a 

27 of 28 528 fingerprint-based check of the state and national criminal history databases, as authorized by 28 
529 CFR 20.33 and Public Law 92-544. 
530  Fingerprints shall be submitted to the identification section of the department of state 
531 police for a state criminal history check and forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for 
532 a national criminal history check, according to the policies and procedures established by the 
533 state identification section and by the department of criminal justice information services. 
534 Fingerprint submissions may be retained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation, the state 
535 identification section and the department of criminal justice information services for requests 
536 submitted by the board of registration in dentistry as authorized under this section to ensure the 
537 continued suitability of these individuals for licensure. The department of criminal justice 
538 information services may disseminate the results of the state and national criminal background 
539 checks to the executive director of the board of registration in dentistry and authorized staff of 
540 the board. 
541  All applicants shall pay a fee to be established by the secretary of administration and 
542 finance, in consultation with the secretary of public safety, to offset the costs of operating and 
543 administering a fingerprint-based criminal background check system. The secretary of 
544 administration and finance, in consultation with the secretary of public safety, may increase the 
545 fee accordingly if the Federal Bureau of Investigation increases its fingerprint background check 
546 service fee. Any fees collected from fingerprinting activity under this chapter shall be deposited 
547 into the Fingerprint-Based Background Check Trust Fund, established in section 2HHHH of 133 
548 chapter 29. 

28 of 28 549  The board of registration in dentistry may receive all criminal offender record 
550 information and the results of checks of state and national criminal history databases under said 
551 Public Law 92-544. When the board of registration in dentistry obtains the results of checks of 
552 state and national criminal history databases, it shall treat the information according to sections 
553 167 to 178, inclusive, of chapter 6 and the regulations thereunder regarding criminal offender 
554 record information. 
555  Notwithstanding subsections 9 and 9 1/2 of section 4 of chapter 151B, if the board of 
556 registration in dentistry receives criminal record information from the state or national 
557 fingerprint-based criminal background checks that includes no disposition or is otherwise 
558 incomplete, the agency head may request that an applicant for licensure provide additional 
559 information regarding the results of the criminal background checks to assist the agency head in 
560 determining the applicant’s suitability for licensure. 
561  SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the secretary of 
562 administration and finance, following a public hearing, shall increase the fee for obtaining or 
563 renewing a license, certificate. registration, permit or authority issued by a board within the 
564 department of public health, excluding the board of registration in medicine, as necessary to 
565 implement the provisions of the Interstate Dental and Dental Hygiene Licensure Compact. The 
566 amount of the increase in fees shall be deposited in the Quality in Health Professions Trust Fund 
567 established in section 35X of chapter 10.